Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 327.011 is amended to read:
327.011. For the purpose of State School Fund distributions for school districts:
(1) Local Revenues are the total of the following:
(a) The amount of revenue offset against local property taxes as determined by the  Department
of Revenue under ORS 311.175 (3)(a)(A).
(b) The  amount of property taxes actually received by the district, including penalties and in-
terest on taxes.
(c) The amount of revenue received by the district from the  Common School Fund under ORS
327.403 to 327.410.
(d) The amount of revenue received by the district from the county school fund.
[(e) The amount of  revenue received by the district from the 25 percent of federal forest reserve
revenues required to be distributed to schools by ORS 294.060 (1). ]
[(f)] (e) The amount of revenue received by the district from state managed forestlands under
ORS 530.115 (1)(b) and (c).
[(g)] (f) Moneys received in lieu of property taxes.
[(h)] (g) Federal  funds received without specific application by the school district and that are
not deemed under federal law to be nonsupplantable.
[(i)] (h) Any positive amount obtained by subtracting the operating property  taxes actually im-
posed by the district, based  on the rate certified pursuant to ORS 310.060, from the amount that
would have been imposed by the district if the district had certified the maximum rate  of operating
property taxes allowed by law.
[(j)] (i) Any amount distributed to the district in the prior fiscal year under ORS 327.019 (8).
(2) Local Revenues do not include:
(a) If a school district imposes local option taxes pursuant to ORS 280.040  to 280.145, an amount
equal to the least of:
(A) The amount of revenue  actually received by the district from local option taxes imposed
pursuant to ORS 280.040 to 280.145;
(B) Twenty-five percent of the total received by the school district from the  general purpose
grant, the transportation grant, the facility  grant and the high cost disabilities grant of the district,
as those grants are calculated under ORS 327.013; or
Enrolled House Bill 3221 (HB 3221-A) Page 1
(C) $2,000 per district extended ADMw, as calculated under  ORS 327.013, increased each fiscal
year by three percent above the amount allowed per district extended ADMw  for the prior fiscal
year.
(b) For a school district with a  statutory rate limit on July 1, 2003, that is greater than $4.50
per $1,000 of assessed value, the amount of property taxes actually  received by the district, includ-
ing penalties and interest on  taxes, that results from an increase in the rate of ad valorem property
tax of the district allowed under Article XI, section 11 (5)(d), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2.  ORS 294.060 is amended to read:
294.060. (1) The moneys received by each county under ORS 293.560  shall be divided 75 percent
to the road fund and 25 percent to the school  fund of the county and, subject to subsection (2) of
this section, the moneys shall be expended as other moneys in those funds are expended.
(2) The moneys apportioned to  the county road fund may be applied in payment of any out-
standing road bonds or may be placed in any county  road bond sinking fund for the purpose of being
so applied.
(3) Notwithstanding the division  of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this section, in any
county east of the summit of the Cascade Mountains with a population of less than 9,000  and more
than 6,500, according to the 1990 federal decennial census,  moneys from the road fund in excess of
$2 million may be transferred to the school fund when the amount of moneys  credited to the road
fund under subsection (1) of this section exceeds the amount needed for county roads,  as determined
by the board of county commissioners. Any amount received by  a school district from the school
fund of the county [ that is in excess of the 25 percent required under subsection  (1) of this section ]
may not be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments from the State
School  Fund.
(4) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this  section, in any
county east of the  summit of the Cascade Mountains with a population of less than 58,000 and more
than 55,000, according to the 1990 federal decennial census, if  the moneys credited to the road fund
under subsection (1) of this section exceed the amount needed for county  roads, as determined by
the county governing body, the  portion of such moneys in excess of an amount specified by the
county governing body may be transferred  to the school fund of the county or may be transferred
directly to the school districts of the county in accordance with procedures established  by the
county governing body. The county governing body may distribute moneys  under this subsection
among the  several school districts without regard to the percentage of the resident average daily
membership in each school district. Moneys transferred under this subsection may  be transferred
upon the condition that any  school district receiving a share of such moneys must use the moneys
only for a purpose described in ORS 328.205 (1)(a)  or (c). Any amount received by a school district
from the county under this subsection [ that is in excess of the  25 percent required under subsection
(1) of  this section ] may not be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments
from the State School Fund.
(5) Notwithstanding the division  of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this section, in any
county east of the summit of  the Cascade Mountains with a population of less than 6,500, according
to the 1990 federal decennial census, moneys received by the county under  ORS 293.560 may be di-
vided between the road  fund and the school fund of the county as specified under an agreement
between the county governing body and the education  service district board of the county that
provides  for  a different apportionment of those moneys. Any amount received by a school district
from the school fund of the county [ that is in excess of the 25 percent required under  subsection (1)
of this section ] may  not be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments
from the State School Fund.
(6) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this  section, in any
county west of the summit of the Cascade Mountains with a population of less  than 19,500 and more
than 6,500, according to the 1990 federal decennial census,  moneys from the road fund in excess of
$1 million may be transferred to the school fund when the amount of moneys  credited to the road
fund under subsection (1) of this section exceeds the amount needed for county roads,  as determined
Enrolled House Bill 3221 (HB 3221-A) Page 2
by the board of county commissioners. Any amount received by  a school district from the school
fund of the county [ that is in excess of the 25 percent required under subsection  (1) of this section ]
may not be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments from the State
School  Fund.
(7) As used in subsections (3) to (6) of this section, “summit of  the Cascade Mountains” has the
meaning given that term in ORS 477.001.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding the division  of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this section, the
moneys that would otherwise be credited to the road fund of a county under subsection (1) of this
section may instead be credited in accordance with this subsection.
(b) Upon  request of the governing body of a county, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall credit the moneys described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection to one of the following
public bodies, provided the service territory of the public body includes the entire county:
(A) An intergovernmental entity created by agreement under ORS 190.003 to 190.130;
(B) A county road district formed under ORS 371.055 to 371.110; or
(C) A service district for roads established under ORS chapter 451.
(c) Moneys credited to a public body under this subsection shall be used in the same  manner
and subject to the same restrictions as would have applied to the moneys  in the hands of the county
that made the  request under paragraph (b) of this subsection, including, but not limited to, the re-
quirements of ORS chapter 368 related to the use of moneys in a county road fund.
(d) The governing body of the county may request that the department discontinue crediting  the
moneys to the public body at any time. Not later than 30 days  after receiving a request under this
paragraph, the department shall resume crediting  the moneys in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 327.011 by section 1 of this 2023  Act apply to State
School Fund distributions commencing with the 2023-2024 distributions.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 8, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3221 (HB 3221-A) Page 3